Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,112
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Outpatient Surgical Procedures Data Act are to provide for: (1) The collection and compilation of outpatient surgical procedure information from hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers; (2) the use and disclosure of such information for public health purposes; and (3) periodic reporting to the Legislature and an annual statistical report.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 2.